Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 46.
HORSE RACING AND PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING AT HOT SPRINGS.

Horse racing and pari-mutuel wagering lawful at Hot Springs.

Horse racing and pari-mutuel wagering thereon shall be lawful in Hot Springs, Garland County, Arkansas, and shall be regulated by the General Assembly.

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment was proposed by initiative petition filed in the office of the Secretary of State on July 5, 1956. It was approved at the general election on Nov. 6, 1956, by a vote of 219,835 for and 161,630 against.